Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 9.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-825
Annual report; contents.

The department shall provide an annual report, no later than December 1, to the Governor and the Legislature on the operation of the Children and Family Support Hotline established under section 71-822, the Family Navigator Program established under section 71-823, and the provision of voluntary post-adoption and post-guardianship case management services under section 71-824.

Laws 2009, LB603, § 9.
May 23, 2009